Connecticut, session 2026, HB05316.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
1 Section 1. (NEW) (Effective October 1, 2026) (a) As used in this section:
2 (1) "Health system" means (A) a parent corporation of one or more
3 hospitals and any entity affiliated with such parent corporation through
4 ownership, governance, membership or other means, or (B) a hospital
5 or any entity affiliated with such hospital through ownership,
6 governance, membership or other means;
7 (2) "Hospital" has the same meaning as provided in section 19a-646
8 of the general statutes;
9 (3) "Main campus of a hospital" means the licensed premises within
10 which the majority of inpatient beds are located;
sHB5316 / File No. 141 1

sHB5316 File No. 141
11 (4) "Operational control" means to (A) influence or direct the actions
12 or policies of any part of a hospital or health system, or (B) choose,
13 appoint or terminate a member of the board, manager, managing
14 member, senior employee, consultant or other individual or entity that
15 participates in the operational oversight of a hospital or health system;
16 (5) "Person" has the same meaning as provided in section 1-79 of the
17 general statutes;
18 (6) "Real estate investment trust" has the same meaning as provided
19 in 26 USC 856, as amended from time to time; and
20 (7) "Sale-leaseback transaction" means a transaction in which a
21 hospital or health system enters into an agreement with another person
22 to sell and lease back hospital or health system-owned real property that
23 constitutes the main campus of a hospital.
24 (b) On and after October 1, 2026, no real estate investment trust shall
25 (1) acquire any operational control over a hospital or health system; or
26 (2) increase any operational control that the real estate investment trust
27 has over a hospital or health system.
28 (c) On and after October 1, 2026, no hospital or health system shall
29 enter into a sale-leaseback transaction.
This act shall take effect as follows and shall amend the following
sections:
Section 1 October 1, 2026 New section
Statement of Legislative Commissioners:
In Subsec. (b)(2), "health care system" was changed to "health system"
for consistency with other provisions of the Section.
BA Joint Favorable Subst. -LCO
sHB5316 / File No. 141 2

sHB5316 File No. 141
The following Fiscal Impact Statement and Bill Analysis are prepared for the benefit of the members of
the General Assembly, solely for purposes of information, summarization and explanation and do not
represent the intent of the General Assembly or either chamber thereof for any purpose. In general,
fiscal impacts are based upon a variety of informational sources, including the analyst’s professional
knowledge. Whenever applicable, agency data is consulted as part of the analysis, however final
products do not necessarily reflect an assessment from any specific department.
OFA Fiscal Note
State Impact: None
Municipal Impact: None
Explanation
The bill prohibits: (1) real estate investment trusts from acquiring or
increasing operational control of hospitals and health systems; and (2)
hospitals and health systems from entering sale-leaseback transactions,
resulting in no fiscal impact to the state or municipalities.
sHB5316 / File No. 141 3

sHB5316 File No. 141
OLR Bill Analysis
sHB 5316
AN ACT PROHIBITING REAL ESTATE INVESTMENT TRUSTS
FROM ACQUIRING OR INCREASING OPERATIONAL CONTROL
OVER HOSPITALS OR HEALTH SYSTEMS AND PROHIBITING
HOSPITALS AND HEALTH SYSTEMS FROM ENTERING INTO
SALE-LEASEBACK FINANCING TRANSACTIONS.